West Virginia, session 2026, HB5691.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: That the balance of the funds available for expenditure in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, Attorney General – Consumer Protection Recovery Fund, fund 1509, fiscal year 2026, organization 1500 be decreased by expiring the amount of $ 2,981,132.08 to the unappropriated surplus balance of the State Fund, General Revenue, to be available for appropriation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.And, That the total appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to fund 0407, fiscal year 2026, organization 0506, be supplemented and amended by adding a new item of appropriation as follows: Title II – Appropriations. Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. Department of Health 58- Department of Health(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0407 FY 2026 Org 0506		General	Appro-	Revenue	priation	Fund 7a Tobacco Education Program -Surplus		xxxxx		2,981,132.08The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home